Washington statutes.
RCW 43.07.040

Custodian of state records.

The secretary of state is charged with the custody:

(1) Of all acts and resolutions passed by the legislature;

(2) Of the journals of the legislature;

(3) Of the seal of the state;

(4) Of all books, records, deeds, parchments, maps, and papers required to be kept on deposit in his or her office pursuant to law;

(5) Of the enrolled copy of the Constitution.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5027; 1965 c 8 s 43.07.040. Prior: 1903 c 107 s 1; 1890 p 629 s 1; RRS s 10991.]